Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201266-902
Definitions; where found.

For purposes of sections 66-901 to 66-914, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 66-902.01 to 66-909.04 apply.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 140, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 2.